South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S106.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 27-13-30 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 27-13-30.  No alien or corporation controlled by aliens, either in his or its own right or as trustee, cestui que trust or agent, shall own or control within the limits of this State more than fiveone hundred thousand acres of land.  Nothing in this section shall apply to lands owned or controlled by any such person or corporation nor to lands mortgaged to such a person or corporation on March 9, 1896, nor shall this section apply to lands conveyed by an alien to a corporation controlled by such alien. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----